Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.110

Quorum—Travel expenses.

(1) A majority of the commission members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business of the commission.

(2) Members of the commission shall be reimbursed for travel expenses, as prescribed by the commission, for each day spent in attendance at, or traveling to and from, commission meetings or when conducting authorized commission business.

[ 1989 c 5 s 10.]